Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF512.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 614.1, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the law governing when a cause of action accrues, including the discovery rule and related doctrines, as recognized by statute or common law. Actions may be brought within the times limited as follows, respectively, after their causes accrue, and not Senate File 512, p. 2 afterwards, except when otherwise specially declared , provided that such time limitations may only be altered by an Act of the general assembly : ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 512, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor